Hawaii statutes.
§264-62 Authority to establish
controlled-access facilities. The director of transportation, acting alone
or in cooperation with any federal, or local agency, may plan, designate,
establish, regulate, vacate, alter, realign, widen, improve, maintain, and
provide controlled-access facilities for public use whenever the director is of
the opinion that traffic conditions, present or future, will justify the
special facilities. The director may regulate, restrict, or prohibit the use
of the controlled-access facilities by the various classes of vehicles or
traffic by means of signs and other devices to promote the safe and efficient
use of the facilities. [L 1960, c 3, pt of §2; Supp, §111-44; HRS §264-62; gen
ch 1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next